Hawaii statutes.
§432:1‑601.5 Coverage for telehealth.
[Section effective until December 31, 2016. For section effective January
1, 2017, see below.] (a) It is the intent of the legislature to recognize
the application of telehealth as a reimbursable service by which an individual
shall receive medical services from a health care provider without face-to-face
contact with the provider.

(b) No mutual benefit society plan that is
issued, amended, or renewed shall require face-to-face contact between a health
care provider and a patient as a prerequisite for payment for services
appropriately provided through telehealth in accordance with generally accepted
health care practices and standards prevailing in the applicable professional
community at the time the services were provided. The coverage required in
this section may be subject to all terms and conditions of the plan agreed upon
among the enrollee or subscriber, the mutual benefit society, and the provider.

(c) Reimbursement for services provided
through telehealth shall be equivalent to reimbursement for the same services
provided via face-to-face contact between a health care provider and a
patient. There shall be no reimbursement for a telehealth consultation between
health care providers unless a health care provider-patient relationship exists
between the patient and one of the health care providers involved in the
telehealth interaction and the patient is accompanied by a treating health care
provider at the time telehealth services are provided by the consulting health
care provider; provided that when behavioral health services are provided, a
second health care provider shall not be required to accompany the patient.

For the purposes of this section, "health
care provider" means a provider of services, as defined in 42 U.S.C.
1395x(u), a provider of medical or other health services, as defined in 42
U.S.C. 1395x(s), and any other person or organization who furnishes, bills, or
is paid for health care in the normal course of business, including but not limited
to primary care providers, mental health providers, oral health providers,
physicians and osteopathic physicians licensed under chapter 453, advanced
practice registered nurses licensed under chapter 457, psychologists licensed
under chapter 465, and dentists licensed under chapter 448.

(d) Notwithstanding chapter 453 or rules
adopted pursuant thereto, in the event that a health care provider-patient
relationship does not exist between the patient and the health care provider to
be involved in a telehealth interaction between the patient and health care
provider, a telehealth mechanism may be used to establish a health care
provider-patient relationship.

(e) For the purposes of this section, "telehealth"
means the use of telecommunications services, as defined in section 269‑1,
including but not limited to real-time video conferencing-based communication,
secure interactive and non‑interactive web-based communication, and
secure asynchronous information exchange, to transmit patient medical information,
including diagnostic-quality digital images and laboratory results for medical
interpretation and diagnosis, for the purpose of delivering enhanced health
care services and information to parties separated by distance. Standard
telephone contacts, facsimile transmissions, or e-mail text, in combination or
by itself, does not constitute a telehealth service for the purposes of this
chapter. [L 1998, c 278, §3; am L 2006, c 219, §3; am L 2009, c 20, §4; am L
2014, c 159, §4]

§432:1‑601.5 Coverage for telehealth. [Section
effective January 1, 2017. For section effective until December 31, 2016, see
above.] (a) It is the intent of the legislature to recognize the
application of telehealth as a reimbursable service by which an individual
shall receive medical services from a health care provider without face-to-face
contact with the health care provider.

(b) No mutual benefit society plan that is
issued, amended, or renewed shall require face-to-face contact between a health
care provider and a patient as a prerequisite for payment for services
appropriately provided through telehealth in accordance with generally accepted
health care practices and standards prevailing in the applicable professional
community at the time the services were provided. The coverage required in
this section may be subject to all terms and conditions of the plan agreed upon
among the enrollee or subscriber, the mutual benefit society, and the health
care provider.

(c) Reimbursement for services provided
through telehealth shall be equivalent to reimbursement for the same services
provided via face-to-face contact between a health care provider and a
patient. Nothing in this section shall require a health care provider to be
physically present with the patient at an originating site unless a health care
provider at the distant site deems it necessary.

(d) Notwithstanding chapter 453 or rules
adopted pursuant thereto, in the event that a health care provider-patient
relationship does not exist between the patient and the health care provider to
be involved in a telehealth interaction between the patient and health care
provider, a telehealth mechanism may be used to establish a health care
provider-patient relationship.

(e) All insurers shall provide current and
prospective enrollees or subscribers with written disclosure of coverages and
benefits associated with telehealth services, including information on
copayments, deductibles, or coinsurance requirements under a policy, contract,
plan, or agreement. The information provided shall be current, understandable,
and available prior to the issuance of a policy, contract, plan, or agreement,
and upon request after the policy, contract, plan, or agreement has been
issued.

(f) Services provided by telehealth pursuant
to this section shall be consistent with all federal and state privacy,
security, and confidentiality laws.

(g) For the purposes of this section:

"Health care provider" means a
provider of services, as defined in title 42 United States Code section
1395x(u), a provider of medical and other health services, as defined in title
42 United States Code section 1395x(s), other practitioners licensed by the
State and working within their scope of practice, and any other person or
organization who furnishes, bills, or is paid for health care in the normal
course of business, including but not limited to primary care providers, mental
health providers, oral health providers, physicians and osteopathic physicians
licensed under chapter 453, advanced practice registered nurses licensed under
chapter 457, psychologists licensed under chapter 465, and dentists licensed
under chapter 448.

"Originating site" means the location
where the patient is located, whether accompanied or not by a health care
provider, at the time services are provided by a health care provider through
telehealth, including but not limited to a health care provider's office,
hospital, health care facility, a patient's home, and other nonmedical
environments such as school-based health centers, university-based health
centers, or the work location of a patient.

"Telehealth" means the use of
telecommunications services, as defined in section 269‑1, to encompass
four modalities: store and forward technologies, remote monitoring, live
consultation, and mobile health; and which shall include but not be limited to
real-time video conferencing-based communication, secure interactive and non‑interactive
web-based communication, and secure asynchronous information exchange, to
transmit patient medical information, including diagnostic-quality digital
images and laboratory results for medical interpretation and diagnosis, for the
purpose of delivering enhanced health care services and information while a
patient is at an originating site and the health care provider is at a distant
site. Standard telephone contacts, facsimile transmissions, or e-mail text, in
combination or by itself, does not constitute a telehealth service for the
purposes of this chapter. [L 1998, c 278, §3; am L 2006, c 219, §3; am L 2009,
c 20, §4; am L 2014, c 159, §4; am L 2016, c 226, §7]

Note

Applicability of L 2016, c 226 requirement for reimbursement
for telehealth services to health benefits plans under chapter 87A. L 2016, c
226, §13.

Cross References

Practice of telehealth, see §453-1.3.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next